Illinois, session 104th, HB3008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance 8Fund. 9    Section 10. The School Code is amended by adding Section 102-3.206 as follows: 11    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)12    Sec. 2-3.206. Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance 13Program. 14    (a) To support Illinois teachers and improve student 15outcomes, the State Board of Education is authorized to 16administer the Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance Program.17    (b) As used in this Section, "necessary classroom 18materials" means: basic classroom materials, such as paper, 19pencils, and art supplies; educational tools, such as 20manipulatives, learning aids, and technology accessories; and 21organizational items, such as storage, bulletin boards, and   HB3008- 2 -LRB104 09369 LNS 19428 b1cleaning supplies. "Necessary classroom materials" does not 2include personal electronics, clothing, and noneducational 3goods.4    (c) The State Board of Education shall create a list of 5preapproved items which may be purchased using funds loaded 6onto a Classroom Supply Assistance Card.7    (d) Subject to appropriation, at the beginning of each 8school quarter starting during the 2027-2028 school year, the 9State Board of Education shall distribute funds from the 10Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance Program Fund to teachers 11throughout the State via State-issued Classroom Supply 12Assistance Cards (CSAC) giving teachers flexibility to 13purchase necessary classroom materials throughout that 14quarter.15    (e) Funds for the Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance 16Program shall be distributed according to a needs-based 17formula taking into account school district funding, district 18poverty rates and Title 1 status, per-pupil spending 19disparities, student performance metrics, and 20teacher-to-student ratios, as determined by the State Board of 21Education. Additional quarterly funding shall be made 22available to teachers in special education, STEM, and arts 23classrooms, reflecting the higher material cost of these 24programs.25    (f) The State Board of Education shall collaborate with 26major office and educational supply retailers, as well as   HB3008- 3 -LRB104 09369 LNS 19428 b1participating local businesses to streamline purchasing.2    (g) Purchases made with a CSAC shall be tracked 3electronically and monitored to ensure compliance with the 4list of approved supplies. Teachers shall have access to an 5online portal to manage funds, review balances, and track 6purchases. Annual audits shall be conducted to maintain 7transparency and prevent misuse.8    (h) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 9shall launch a pilot program in high-needs districts for the 102025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years to test the funding model 11and distribution process. The State Board of Education shall 12annually report to the Governor and the General Assembly on 13the status of the Program and any problems that arose with its 14implementation in the preceding calendar year. Adjustments 15shall be made based on the pilot's feedback and results.16    (i) The Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance Fund is 17created as a special fund in the State treasury for the purpose 18of funding the Illinois Classroom Supply Assistance Program.